Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,225
Election; notice.

The county board shall give notice of the submission of the question of imposing a license or occupation tax under section 77-27,223 not more than thirty days nor less than ten days prior to the election, by publication one time in one or more newspapers published in or of general circulation in the county in which such question is to be submitted. The notice shall be in addition to any other notice required under the general election laws of this state.

Laws 2002, LB 259, § 3.